North Dakota, session 69, HB1050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 24-02-45 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
24-02-45. Cooperative agreements with counties or cities.
The director may enter an agreement with a state agency, county, or city for the cooperative
or joint administration of an activity that will enhance the efficiency and effectiveness of the state
highway system. At the request of a state, county, or city law enforcement agency or a federal
agency with responsibilities related to control of the national border, the director shall enter into
an agreement with the requesting law enforcement agency, or with the state agency or political
subdivision of which the law enforcement agency is a part, for the placement of license plate
readers on department-owned or department-operated equipment or infrastructure for law
enforcement or border control purposes. The terms of the agreement supersede sections
24-02-36 and 24-02-37 or any other state law governing the use of state, county, or city highway
funds.
Page No. 1 25.8034.01000